vi: Thiết bị điện tử > In, photocopy, quét & fax > Phụ kiện máy in, máy photocopy và máy fax > Linh kiện máy in, máy photocopy và máy fax: Đơn vị Fuser; Khay và hộp cấp giấy; Dây đai máy in; Cáp thay thế máy in; Con lăn máy in
ru: Электроника > Печать, копирование, сканирование и работа с факсами > Аксессуары для принтеров, копиров и факсов > Запасные детали для принтеров, копиров и факсов: Термоблоки; Лотки и податчики бумаги; Ремни для принтеров; Сменные кабели для принтеров; Ролики для принтеров
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 多功能事務機 > 印表機/影印機/傳真機配件 > 印表機/影印機/傳真機替換零件: 定影組件; 紙張盒及進紙器; 印表機皮帶; 印表機替換纜線; 印表機滾筒
lt-LT: Elektronika > Spausdinimas, kopijavimas, nuskaitymas ir faksas > Spausdintuvų, kopijavimo aparatų ir fakso aparatų priedai > Spausdintuvų, kopijavimo aparatų ir fakso aparatų atsarginės dalys: Lydintuvo mazgai; Popieriaus dėklai ir tiekikliai; Spausdintuvo diržai; Spausdintuvo pakaitiniai kabeliai; Spausdintuvo voleliai
fi: Elektroniikka > Tulostus, kopiointi, skannaus ja faksaus > Tulostinten, kopiokoneiden ja faksien lisätarvikkeet > Tulostimen, kopiokoneen ja faksin varaosat: Kiinnitysyksikkö; Paperilokero ja syöttölaite; Tulostinhihna; Tulostimen vaihtokaapeli; Tulostintela
ko: 전자기기 > 인쇄/ 복사/스캔/팩스 > 프린터/복사기/팩스 부대용품 > 프린터/복사기/팩스 교체 부품: 퓨저 유닛; 용지 트레이 및 급지 장치; 프린터 벨트; 프린터 교체 케이블; 프린터 롤러
sl-SI: Elektronika > Tiskanje, kopiranje, skeniranje in faksiranje > Dodatki za tiskalnike, kopirne stroje in fakse > Nadomestni deli za tiskalnike, kopirne stroje in fakse: Fiksirne enote; Predali in podajalniki papirja; Trakovi za tiskalnike; Nadomestni kabli za tiskalnike; Valji za tiskalnike
cs: Elektronika > Tisk, kopírování, skenování a faxování > Příslušenství k tiskárnám, kopírkám, skenerům a faxům > Náhradní díly k tiskárnám, kopírkám, skenerům a faxům: Fixační jednotky; Zásobníky papíru a podavače; Tiskové pásy; Náhradní kabely tiskáren; Tiskové válečky
sv: Elektronik > Utskrift, kopiering, skanning och fax > Tillbehör till skrivare, kopiator och fax > Reservdelar till skrivare, kopiator och fax: Fuserenheter; Pappersfack och -matare; Skrivarremmar; Skrivarersättningskablar; Skrivarrullar
nb: Elektronikk > Utskrift, kopi, skann og faks > Tilbehør til skrivere, kopimaskiner og faksmaskiner > Reservedeler til skrivere, kopimaskiner og faksmaskiner: Fikseringsenheter; Papirskuffer og matere; Skriverbelter; Skriver-erstatningskabler; Skriverruller
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de impressora, copiadora e fax > Peças sobressalentes de impressora, copiadora e fax: Unidades fusoras; Tabuleiros e alimentadores de papel; Correias de impressora; Cabos de substituição de impressora; Rolos de impressora
hu: Elektronika > Nyomtatás, másolás, szkennelés és faxolás > Nyomtató-, fénymásoló- és faxgép-kiegészítők > Nyomtató-, fénymásoló- és faxgép-cserealkatrészek: Beégető egységek; Papírtálcák és -adagolók; Nyomtatószíjak; Nyomtató-cserekábelek; Nyomtatógörgők
de: Elektronik > Drucken, Kopieren, Scannen & Faxen > Zubehör für Drucker, Kopierer & Faxgeräte > Ersatzteile für Drucker, Kopierer & Faxgeräte: Fixiereinheiten; Papierschalen und -zuführungen; Druckerriemen; Drucker-Ersatzkabel; Druckerwalzen
it: Elettronica > Stampa, copia, scansione e fax > Accessori per stampanti, fotocopiatrici e fax > Parti di ricambio per stampanti, fotocopiatrici e fax: Unità di fusione; Vassoi e alimentatori di carta; Cinghie della stampante; Cavi di ricambio della stampante; Rulli della stampante
ro-RO: Electronice > Imprimare, copiere, scanare și fax > Accesorii pentru imprimante, copiatoare și faxuri > Piese de schimb pentru imprimante, copiatoare și faxuri: Unități fusor; Tăvi și alimentatoare de hârtie; Curele pentru imprimante; Cabluri de înlocuire pentru imprimante; Role pentru imprimante
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εκτύπωση, Αντιγραφή, Σάρωση & Φαξ > Αξεσουάρ εκτυπωτών, φωτοαντιγραφικών & φαξ > Ανταλλακτικά εκτυπωτών, φωτοαντιγραφικών & φαξ: Μονάδες fuser; Δίσκοι & τροφοδότες χαρτιού; Ιμάντες εκτυπωτή; Ανταλλακτικά καλώδια εκτυπωτή; Κύλινδροι εκτυπωτή
es: Electrónica > Fax, escáner, copiadora e impresora > Accesorios para máquinas de fax, impresoras y fotocopiadoras > Piezas de repuesto para máquinas de fax, impresoras y fotocopiadoras: Unidades fusoras; Bandejas de papel y alimentadores; Correas de impresora; Cables de repuesto de impresora; Rodillos de impresora
bg-BG: Електроника > Печат, копиране, сканиране и факс > Аксесоари за принтери, копирни машини и факс машини > Резервни части за принтери, копирни и факс машини: Термоблокове; Тави и устройства за автоматично подаване на хартия; Ремъци за принтер; Резервни кабели за принтер; Ролки за принтер
sk-SK: Elektronika > Tlač, kopírovanie, skenovanie a faxovanie > Príslušenstvo k tlačiarňam, kopírkam a faxom > Náhradné diely pre tlačiarne, kopírky a faxy: Fixačné jednotky; Zásobníky papiera a podávače; Pásy tlačiarní; Náhradné káble tlačiarní; Valčeky tlačiarní
ja: 電子機器 > プリンター・コピー機 > プリンター・コピー機関連用品 > プリンター・コピー機用交換部品: 定着ユニット; 給紙トレイとフィーダー; プリンターベルト; プリンター交換用ケーブル; プリンターローラー
en: Electronics > Print, Copy, Scan & Fax > Printer, Copier & Fax Machine Accessories > Printer, Copier & Fax Machine Replacement Parts: Fuser Units; Paper Trays & Feeders; Printer Belts; Printer Replacement Cables; Printer Rollers
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Acessórios de máquinas de fax, copiadoras e impressoras > Peças de reposição para máquinas de fax, copiadoras e impressoras: Unidades fusoras; Bandejas e alimentadores de papel; Correias para impressora; Cabos de substituição para impressora; Rolos para impressora
tr: Elektronik > Yazıcı, Fotokopi, Tarayıcı ve Faks > Yazıcı, Fotokopi Makinesi ve Faks Makinesi Aksesuarları > Yazıcı, Fotokopi Makinesi ve Faks Makinesi Yedek Parçaları: Isıtıcı Üniteler; Kağıt Tepsileri ve Besleyicileri; Yazıcı Kayışları; Yazıcı Yedek Kabloları; Yazıcı Ruloları
fr: Appareil électronique > Impression, copie, numérisation et télécopie > Accessoires pour imprimantes, copieurs et télécopieurs > Pièces de rechange pour imprimantes, copieurs et télécopieurs: Unités de fusion (fuseurs); Bacs à papier et chargeurs; Courroies d’imprimante; Câbles de rechange pour imprimante; Rouleaux d’imprimante
nl: Elektronica > Afdrukken, kopiëren, scannen en faxen > Accessoires voor printers, kopieerapparaten en faxmachines > Vervangingsonderdelen voor voor printers, kopieerapparaten en faxmachines: Fusereenheid; Papierladen en papierinvoeren; Printerbanden; Printer-vervangingskabels; Printerrollen
pl: Elektronika > Drukowanie, kopiowanie, skanowanie i faksowanie > Akcesoria do kopiarek, drukarek i faksów > Części zamienne do kopiarek, drukarek i faksów: Jednostki fusera; Tace papieru i podawacze; Paski drukarki; Kable zastępcze drukarki; Rolki drukarki
hr-HR: Elektronika > Ispis, kopiranje, skeniranje i faksiranje > Dodaci za pisače, fotokopirne i faks uređaje > Zamjenski dijelovi za pisače, fotokopirne uređaje i faks uređaje: Grijače jedinice; Ladice za papir i uvlakači; Remeni pisača; Zamjenski kabeli za pisač; Valjci pisača
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > พิมพ์ คัดลอก สแกน และแฟกซ์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องพิมพ์ เครื่องถ่ายเอกสาร และแฟกซ์ > อุปกรณ์อะไหล่สำหรับเครื่องพิมพ์ เครื่องถ่ายเอกสาร และแฟกซ์: ชุดฟิวเซอร์; ถาดและตัวป้อนกระดาษ; สายพานเครื่องพิมพ์; สายเคเบิลทดแทนเครื่องพิมพ์; โรลเลอร์เครื่องพิมพ์
da: Elektronik > Udskriv, kopiér, scan og fax > Tilbehør til printer, kopimaskine og fax > Reservedele til printer, kopimaskine og fax: Fuser-enheder; Papirbakker og fødere; Printer – remme; Printer – udskiftningskabler; Printer – ruller
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 打印/复印/扫描/传真 > 打印机、复印机和传真机配件 > 打印机、复印机和传真机更换部件: 定影单元; 纸盘和送纸器; 打印机传送带; 打印机替换线缆; 打印机滚轮